Utah statutes.
10-6-126.   Reduction of total budget appropriation of department by resolution -- Notice to governing body.

The total budget appropriation of any department may be reduced for purposes other than transfer to another department by resolution of the governing body at any regular meeting, or special meeting, called for that purpose, if notice of the proposed action is given to all members of the governing body at least five days before such action. The notice may be waived in writing or orally during attendance at the meeting by any member of the governing body.

